Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Andranik Migranyan: "Russia and the Near Abroad: </F>
Formation of a New Foreign Policy Course of the Russian 
Federation (Introductory Observations)"] 
<H5>  [12 Jan 94 pp 1, 4] </H5>
  [Text] NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA today begins publication 
of an article by Andranik Migranyan, member of the Presidential 
Council, devoted to Russia's relations with the independent 
states that have emerged in the place of the former USSR. The 
author needs no further introduction, and his article, as 
always, focused, interesting, and contentious in places, is 
essentially a concise, but fundamental outline of the problems 
and trends whose development NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA has tried to 
follow closely and for an analysis of which it has begrudged no 
space. 
  The complexity and contradictoriness of the process of the 
formation of Russian foreign policy, particularly following the 
disintegration of the USSR, are explained by a totality of 
subjective and objective factors. 
  Mention should be made primarily among the objective factors 
of the fact that the presence of a subject of international 
relations, that is, a state with its established institutions in 
a particular geopolitical space, is required for the shaping of 
foreign policy. As far as Russia is concerned, it is still in 
the process of formation of its statehood in both the 
institutional and geographical respects since its external 
borders not only were not determined in 1991, they have not yet 
been determined now either. The unity and territorial integrity 
of Russia have already been challenged by Chechnya and 
Tatarstan, and Tuva, Bashkortostan, and a number of other 
republics and regions of the Russian Federation are moving in 
this direction. 
  A second objective factor not contributing to the shaping of 
foreign policy as a whole and policy in respect to countries of 
the near abroad in particular is the analogous process of the 
incompletion of the formation of statehood in the former Soviet 
republics and the amorphous and friable nature of the 
institutional system in them. The internal fragmentation and 
imprecision of the borders of these republics have become the 
cause of innumerable interethnic and regional conflicts that 
have hit these countries since the disintegration of the Soviet 
Union. A graphic example of this is the situation in Azerbaijan 
in connection with the war in Karabakh and in Moldova on account 
of the virtual detachment of the Dniester region; Georgia and 
Tajikistan, which are rent by civil war and interethnic wars; 
and so forth. 
  Even in the republics where things have not progressed as 
far 
as armed clashes and the open defection of individual 
territories, very serious tension in terms of the ethnic and 
regional gauges is being felt. This applies both to Ukraine and 
Kazakhstan and the Baltic republics. 
  These factors in aggregate are preventing Russia from 
defining its external and internal borders. It should be 
considered that the Russian Federation was an artificial 
formation within the old Soviet Union with arbitrarily 
established administrative borders not geared to the fact that 
they might all of a sudden unexpectedly become international. 
  Since the disintegration of the USSR a paradoxical situation 
has taken shape, in which the Russian Federation has on the one 
hand found itself to be less than Russia, if it is considered 
that more than 25 million Russians are outside it, and, on the 
other, more than Russia, considering the fact that the national 
autonomies have declared themselves republics, and some are 
trying to withdraw from the Russian Federation without prior 
arrangement. 
  Thus to summarize the totality of objective factors that 
have 
complicated the process of the shaping of foreign policy, it may 
be concluded that the difficulties Russia is experiencing in 
relations with its immediate surroundings have been caused 
largely by the absence of a subject of international relations 
and the uncertainty of the borders of the Russian state, which 
have prevented the possibility of a precise and clear 
determination of Russia's neighbors, which, incidentally, are 
themselves in a similar position, determination of friends and 
enemies, and ascertainment of geopolitical interests, 
particularly in regions of the near abroad. 
  To this should be added the not inconsiderable fact that 
Russia has for many decades had no experience or traditions of 
the establishment of interstate relations with the former Union 
republics and that, as a result, Moscow has found itself without 
the personnel, traditions, and notions of Russia's interests in 
these regions. However, a role of considerable importance in the 
amorphous and uncertain nature of Russian foreign policy in 
relation to the near abroad has been performed by subjective 
factors partially inherited from the old Union by young Russian 
diplomacy and the new Russian state and partially on account of 
an incorrect appreciation of Russia's place and role in the 
post-Soviet space and in the world in general made by Foreign 
Minister Kozyrev and a number of other leaders of the new 
Russian state. It should be noted that among the subjective 
factors inherited from the old Union and the 
Gorbachev-Shevardnadze foreign policy has been the fact that 
both the Union leadership in the perestroyka years and the 
Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs failed even in general 
outline to formulate a positive foreign policy with regard to 
the national and state interests of the USSR and Russia. The 
attempts to revise the old foreign policy of the USSR made by 
Gorbachev and Shevardnadze, which were undoubtedly of positive 
significance in terms of their stated goals, developed in their 
realization into unilateral concessions culminating in the 
disorderly flight of the USSR from all areas of the world of 
critical importance to it, where the USSR had great influence, 
without adequate compensation for this from the West. 
  As a result a foreign policy designed to be an important 
factor creating the stability of the political system and 
contributing to the successful implementation of domestic policy 
reforms within the framework of perestroyka became an additional 
factor of the destabilization of the domestic political 
situation in the Soviet Union, gave rise to serious tension in 
the army sphere and in society as a whole, and resulted in 
colossal irretrievable losses in the military-political sphere. 
  The unilateral concessions of Soviet foreign policy were 
aimed at obtaining economic and political support for 
Gorbachev's reforms, but these expectations ended in total 
failure. The proposals for the neutralization of the GDR and the 
"Finlandization" of East Europe, in particular, which I made in 
1989 were ignored by the architects of the policy of perestroyka 
and, as a result, the unification of Germany and the departure 
from East Europe were paid for with symbolic amounts of aid, 
empty prattle, clamorous applause, and friendly pats on the back 
for Gorbachev and Shevardnadze from the leaders of the United 
States and other Western countries. 
  Thus the one-dimensional superpower, as the USSR was called, 
the reference being to the military aspect, which had made this 
state a superpower, was unable as a result of the hapless policy 
of the Soviet leadership to exchange its military might and 
geopolitical presence in Germany and East Europe for tangible 
economic and political benefits at the time of realization of 
the reform of the economic and political system within the 
country. 
  An example of a total absence of a positive foreign policy 
was the Soviet Union's position at the time of the war in the 
Persian Gulf. While each ally of the United States was making 
its participation in the war or support for the United States' 
action against Iraq dependent on all kinds of economic or 
political benefits, the Soviet Union, on whose position the fate 
of the UN mandate for the realization of military intervention 
depended to a decisive extent, was, in the channel of the 
already traditional romantic foreign policy supporting the 
United States and Western countries in the Security Council, 
proceeding from utopian and philanthropic considerations and 
receiving nothing in exchange. The Russian Ministry of Foreign 
Affairs inherited this foreign policy from the Union ministry, 
and if it is considered that Minister Kozyrev and other leaders 
of Russia's Foreign Ministry were "even more Catholic than the 
pope" in asserting the unity of goals and values of Russia and 
the United States and the Western community as a whole, it comes 
as no surprise that the evolution of the foreign policy of the 
USSR and, subsequently, of Russia also reached its logical 
conclusion following the disintegration of the Soviet Union. 
Kozyrev and other Russian leaders substituted for one 
ideological purpose, Marxist-Leninist, in accordance with which 
it was essential to expand the Soviet model all over the world 
and counteract the policy of the United States and the West on 
all azimuths, another ideological purpose, in accordance with 
which there has since the liquidation of the CPSU and 
Marxist-Leninist ideology been a complete unity of goals and 
values between the United States and the West and Russia. 
Russia, according to this logic, automatically became a part of 
the civilized world community, and for this reason the need for 
the formulation of specific national-state interests of Russia 
in respect to the far abroad was no longer an issue. And as far 
as the near abroad is concerned, it was assumed that the former 
Union republics and the socialist countries of East Europe had 
immediately become wholly detached and independent and in 
respect to which Russia has no specific interests and that in 
respect to all current or newly emergent problems in these 
regions Russia would act with the United States and other 
Western countries, sharing with them joint responsibility for 
political and economic stability in these regions. 
  Mention should also be made among the subjective factors of 
a 
serious miscalculation of the Russian leadership, which hoped 
that it would be possible after the Belovezha agreements to 
dissolve the USSR to preserve the common military-political and 
economic space within the framework of the newly created 
Commonwealth. Nor was the Russian leadership prepared for a 
number of republics not joining the CIS at all or for others, 
particularly Ukraine, speeding up the formation of their own 
armies and the process of demolition of the common 
military-political and economic space. 
  I would like to emphasize once again a most important 
subjective factor which for a long time prevented the Russian 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs from formulating a clear 
understanding of Russia's place and role in the post-Soviet 
space. Neither the leaders of the Foreign Ministry nor 
politicians of a higher level were aware of the transitional 
nature of the formation of statehood either in Russia or the 
other republics, the conditional nature of the administrative 
borders, which had overnight become international, and the 
presence of the deep-lying factors of a demographic, economic, 
historical, and geopolitical nature, which objectively did not 
allow of a mechanical transference to the relations between 
Russia and these republics of the standards and rules which 
existed between the Soviet Union and the countries of the far 
abroad. 
  As a result of the miscalculations in the appreciation of 
the 
role and place of Russia and the deep-seated nature of the 
relations between Russia and the countries of the near abroad, 
the leaders of Russia's Foreign Ministry and other of the 
country's political leaders drew the strategically erroneous 
conclusion that Russia should turn in upon itself within the 
borders of the Russian Federation, move out of all the former 
republics of the USSR, not intervene in the interethnic and 
regional conflicts of the former Union, and contribute to the 
internationalization of the process of a resolution of these 
conflicts, thereby openly and publicly renouncing any special 
rights or interests in the post-Soviet space outside of the 
borders of the Russian Federation. This position of the Russian 
leadership was expressed in greatest relief at the conference on 
Russia's foreign policy problems organized by the Foreign 
Ministry in February 1992 in the Moscow State International 
Relations Institute and formed the basis of the report of 
Foreign Minister Kozyrev and Supreme Soviet Chairman 
Khasbulatov. It is no accident that these propositions of 
Kozyrev's report formed the basis of the first version of the 
concept of foreign policy of the Russian Federation prepared by 
the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of the Russian Federation in the 
spring of that same year. But the events that occurred in 1992 
in Russia and the republics made appreciable adjustments to the 
understanding of Russia's place and role in the post-Soviet 
space. Although the objective factors noted above are still to a 
considerable extent impeding the formation of an adequate 
foreign policy, the subject factor has undergone considerable 
change. It has been recognized increasingly distinctly among the 
serious part of the political establishment and analysts, by no 
means only among those who, in Kozyrev's words, represented and 
continue to represent the "war party," that Russia has a special 
role in the post-Soviet space. The profound involvement of 
Russia in the military conflicts in the Dniester region, 
Abkhazia, and Ossetia made obvious the proposition of those 
analysts that, first, Russia would not manage to "remain aloof" 
beyond the borders of the Russian Federation, not intervening in 
conflicts on the perimeter of its border; second, the 
international community, burdened with a multitude of problems 
in the former Yugoslavia, Africa, and other parts of the world, 
is not consumed by a desire to participate actively in a 
resolution of these conflicts on the territory of the former 
USSR, and even were there such a burning desire, it could hardly 
do anything for a resolution of these crises without the active 
participation of Russia itself; and, third, the conflicts along 
Russia's perimeter, involving it in them directly or indirectly, 
have begun to exert a considerable influence on the domestic 
political process and the struggle of various political forces 
in Russia itself. 
  The conflicts in the Dniester region, when for the first 
time 
ethnic Russians found themselves involved in military 
operations, and then in South Ossetia and in Abkhazia, where 
Russia came to be involved in the military operations directly 
since kindred peoples of the North Caucasus within the Russian 
Federation were acting in support of their brethren with weapon 
in hand, cleaved the erstwhile unified idea of Russia's foreign 
policy in the near abroad. Several centers involved in the 
process of the shaping of foreign policy in the near abroad were 
formed. Mention may be made of at least three of these centers, 
which existed right up until 1992. These were first and foremost 
the Foreign Ministry, which attempted to stay within the 
framework of the aims in respect to the former republics that 
had been formulated by the minister, which evoked sharp 
criticism of both the Foreign Ministry and the minister himself 
on the part of many representatives of political and academic 
circles. A serious independent factor of the formulation of 
Russia's foreign policy was for a long time Vice President 
Rutskoy, who largely by his support of the operations of the 
14th Army in the Dniester region and his hard line in respect to 
the leadership of Moldova contributed to a stabilization of the 
situation in the Dniester region. His numerous statements 
against the leadership of Ukraine--on the question of 
Crimea--and Georgia--on account of the latter's behavior in 
respect to Russian troops--worked to increase the popularity of 
Rutskoy himself, particularly if it is considered that this was 
accompanied by criticism of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of 
the Russian Federation and was thickly interspersed with 
patriotic rhetoric. The third center attempting to shape or, at 
least, influence Russia's foreign policy, particularly in the 
near abroad, was the Supreme Soviet. Considering the political 
views of the vast majority of the corps of deputies, it is no 
wonder that the Supreme Soviet was an implacable opponent of the 
policy of Yeltsin and Kozyrev, losing no opportunity on each 
convenient occasion to accuse Kozyrev of a betrayal of Russia's 
national interests, and Yeltsin, of having torn apart the united 
Russian state, as a result of which millions of Russians had 
become foreigners in their former homeland. Considering the 
sentiments of the corps of deputies, Supreme Soviet Chairman 
Ruslan Khasbulatov was together with the opposition deputies the 
first high-ranking politician to demand of the government and 
the president more decisive actions in the conflict zones in 
which Russia had come to be directly or indirectly involved. As 
if in competition with Vice President Rutskoy, Khasbulatov 
categorically demanded of Georgia the termination of military 
operations against South Ossetia, threatening otherwise that 
Russia would recognize the independence of the latter. 
  I formulated for the first time in a number of articles in 
ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA the central idea which subsequently became 
determining in the understanding of Russia's role and place in 
the post-Soviet space with all leading politicians of Russia, 
from the president through Foreign Minister Kozyrev. It amounts 
to the fact that the entire geopolitical space of the former 
Soviet Union is a sphere of Russia's vital interests. Lest 
anyone be in any doubt as to what I had in mind by vital 
interests, I drew a parallel with the Monroe Doctrine. I 
attempted in a sense to formulate a Russian Monroe Doctrine with 
reference to the present situation that has taken shape 
following the disintegration of the Soviet Union. Initially this 
concept was criticized in the democratic press and in circles 
close to the Foreign Ministry, but it received considerable 
support among quite a large number of politicians and 
specialists in international relations and, what is very 
important, full support on the part of Yevgeniy Ambartsumov, 
chairman of the Russian Parliament's International Relations 
Committee. By the summer of 1992, I believe, such an 
understanding of Russia's role and place had, despite the 
opposition of the Foreign Ministry, gradually come to prevail in 
political and public circles. There was great significance in 
the fact that not only the neocommunists and national patriots, 
whose arguments Kozyrev was able to ignore, accusing them of 
being members of the "war party," but people who had earned in 
society the reputation of responsible and sober analysts and 
politicians were speaking in support of such an understanding of 
Russia's place and role, which subsequently exerted a decisive 
influence on the shaping of the new foreign policy paradigm in 
relation to the near abroad. 
  Just a few months later Kozyrev, competing with Rutskoy and 
Khasbulatov in patriotic rhetoric, began to speak about the 
geopolitical space of the former USSR as a zone of Russia's 
special interests. In March 1992 this thought was heard from the 
lips of the president of Russia himself. The importance of the 
fact that this concept was formulated not in the 
national-patriotic or communist environment was that the 
president was able to accept and support this concept and 
identify with it. And it would have been difficult for both 
Kozyrev and politicians and analysts in the West to discern in 
such an evolution of Russia's foreign policy line an increase in 
the influence of reactionary forces in the weakening of the 
positions of the democrats. Although Western politicians and 
analysts did not under the influence of Kozyrev's simplistic 
black-and-white interpretation of the Russian domestic policy 
situation allow of the thought even of the possibility of the 
formation of a positive foreign policy concept enjoying broad 
support in national elite groups and not being the result of the 
one-sided ideological domination of radical-democratic or 
national-patriotic forces. Concluding the introductory part of 
this study, I consider it necessary to note that it is in this 
broad context of the formation of Russia's foreign policy 
doctrine that I propose to examine subsequently Russia's 
relations with the former republics of the USSR. 
<H5>  [18 Jan 94 pp 4-5, 8] </H5>
  [Text] 
<H5>  Ukraine </H5>
  It is impossible to speak about Russian-Ukrainian relations 
without at least a cursory description of the process of the 
formation of Ukrainian statehood. Twenty-three percent of the 
population of Ukraine is composed of Russians. From 40 to 50 
percent of the population speak Russian and were raised on 
Russian culture. This applies particularly to Left-Bank Ukraine, 
where the scientific and technological and industrial potential 
of Ukraine is concentrated, in the main. Following the 
announcement of its independence, Ukraine, like all the other 
former Union republics, encountered a dilemma in the business of 
its constitutional development. Either it should have taken the 
path of the creation of a national state like the Baltic 
republics, Georgia, and others, where what is understood by the 
idea of national state was a state of the titular nationality, 
which would ultimately have led to the creation of an 
ethnocratic state with all the ensuing conflicts and 
contradictions, which are already being encountered on this path 
by the said states, where brutal conflicts between the titular 
nation and other national groups are occurring. This path was 
barred to Ukraine at the first stage on account of the complex 
national-cultural situation since attempts at the immediate 
creation of an ethnocratic state, considering the presence of 
the Russian factor, could have signified a split of the young 
fledgling Ukrainian state along ethno-cultural lines. This is 
why Ukraine opted for the second path of formation of the state, 
which presupposed that the Ukrainian state would be a state of 
all the ethnic groups, regardless of whether they were titular 
or not. The set task, therefore, was the creation of a political 
nation, which was to have averted demarcation along 
ethno-cultural lines, which could have prevented the formation 
of the young state. This approach of the Ukrainian leadership 
was perfectly justified and largely corresponds to contemporary 
notions of the national state. But it required a number of 
conditions for its realization. In order to consolidate a 
political nation and on this basis build a national state a 
sufficiently high level of socioeconomic development as would 
contribute to the integration in an organic whole of the 
representatives of the different ethnic groups is necessary. 
This is particularly important if account is taken of the factor 
that this state, with a large ethnic minority, borders a vast 
country which was yesterday even considered the homeland of this 
minority. We are speaking of Russia, of course. If at the 
initial stage Ukraine's relative economic prosperity worked in 
favor of Ukraine's independence [sentence as published]. Many 
Russians voted in December 1991 for an independent Ukraine, and 
many analysts rightly explained the results of the referendum by 
the fact that cheaper "sausages" in Ukraine were of decisive 
significance for the citizens in the voting at the referendum. 
Nor, of course, can we forget such an important factor as Russia 
in this period undergoing a profound internal economic and 
political crisis expressed in the conflict between the Union 
center and the leadership of Russia and many people, not only 
Ukrainians but Russians also, having voted for the independence 
of Ukraine, voting for "sausage," stability, and order. But as 
the economic situation deteriorated, the attempts to create a 
political nation in Ukraine and the creation on this basis of 
Ukrainian statehood became increasingly problematical. By the 
end of spring 1993, according to the data of sociological 
surveys, more than 50 percent of Ukrainians were expressing 
regret in connection with the disintegration of the USSR. This 
figure was over the 60 percent mark in the east of the republic. 
The end of 1992 and the whole of 1993, as a consequence of the 
incessant deterioration in the economic situation in Ukraine, 
testify to a waning of the impulses from the west of Ukraine 
aimed at the speediest detachment of Ukraine from Russia and an 
intensification of the process of the Ukrainianization of the 
eastern and southern regions of the country and the renunciation 
of all forms of Ukraine's close economic and military-political 
cooperation with Russia both within the framework of the CIS and 
on the basis of bilateral relations. 
  As a counterweight to this, the impulses coming from the 
East, where both the bulk of the republic's industrial base and 
the Russian-speaking population, with its cultural and 
linguistic gravitation toward Russia, are concentrated, are 
intensifying. It is these regions that have experienced the most 
devastating consequences of the slump in industrial production 
on account of the severance of business ties to Russia and as a 
result of the energy starvation. Only thanks to powerful strikes 
which encompassed the eastern regions of the country did Premier 
Kuchma sign off on economic Union with Russia and Belarus, and 
Kravchuk begin to speak of the possibilities of 
military-political cooperation between Ukraine and Russia and of 
the possibilities dual citizenship in Crimea. Russia's present, 
still indeterminate, policy in respect to Ukraine cannot be 
understood without regard to all these factors. Three approaches 
in relations with Ukraine may be distinguished in Russia today 
among politicians and analysts. The Foreign Ministry formally 
adheres to the position that Ukraine is a self-sufficient 
independent state and that Russia has no territorial or other 
claims on this country. The Foreign Ministry notes here, of 
course, the unsolved questions in the sphere of nuclear weapons 
on account of Ukraine's continuing refusal to fulfill the Lisbon 
Agreement or to ratify the CIS-I [as published] Treaty, which de 
facto makes Ukraine a nuclear power. But, on the whole, the 
approach proceeds from the fact of the independence and 
territorial integrity of Ukraine as a self-sufficient state. 
This position of the Foreign Ministry, with which the president 
also identifies in fact, was most savagely criticized by the 
Supreme Soviet of the Russian Federation. 
  As of 1992 the Supreme Soviet underpinned Russia's 
territorial claims on Ukraine on the Crimea issue with legal 
foundations. The Supreme Soviet of the Russian Federation deemed 
illegal the transfer of Crimea to Ukraine in 1954 and in July 
1993 adopted the decision that Sevastopol was, is now, and will 
remain a Russian city. Furthermore, the Supreme Soviet also 
adopted a decision on the indivisibility of the Black Sea Fleet. 
For a number of politicians in Russia, Crimea and the Black Sea 
Fleet are of paramount significance for a normalization of 
relations between Russia and Ukraine, and they, proceeding 
partially from these considerations and partially taking 
advantage of this factor to take a stab at the president and the 
Foreign Ministry and also to score points with the Russian 
public, presenting themselves as the sole patriots zealous for 
Russia's interests, have been harping constantly on the problems 
of Crimea, creating tension in Russian-Ukrainian relations. 
  In the opinion of another part of Russian politicians and 
analysts, this position of national patriots concerned for 
momentary populist benefits for themselves is counterproductive 
since it affords Kravchuk and other politicians of a nationalist 
persuasion in Ukraine an opportunity to inflame anti-Russian 
hysteria and to present Russia in the role of potential 
aggressor encroaching on the territorial integrity of Ukraine 
and on this basis to consolidate their power, muffling the 
public's discontent with the serious economic situation and 
justifying the renunciation of closer economic and 
military-political cooperation with Russia. This group of 
politicians and analysts believes that Ukraine is a fragile, 
artificial, heterogeneous ethno-political formation lacking any 
real chance of the formation of its own statehood and that a 
deterioration in the socioeconomic situation will lead to the 
further division of this formation along ethno-regional lines 
and confront the Ukrainian leadership with the dilemma of either 
agreeing to closer economic and military-political integration 
with Russia directly or within the framework of the CIS in order 
to preserve Ukraine's territorial integrity, or, on the other 
hand, this will lead to the breakup of Ukraine into several 
parts with possible civil war between the different regions. In 
both cases Russia, without putting direct pressure on Ukraine, 
as is being done with Crimea, mistakenly, in my view, is in a 
position to bring Ukraine back into the orbit of its interests, 
preventing the use directly of the anti-Russia card for 
consolidation of the fledgling Ukrainian statehood. 
  In examining the current questions of Russian-Ukrainian 
relations it is impossible not to dwell, if only briefly, on the 
question of Ukraine's nuclear weapons and the Black Sea Fleet. 
Speaking of Crimea, we partially broached the problem of the 
Black Sea Fleet. The difficulties connected with the fleet are 
explained by the fact that it is has today become obvious to the 
majority of officers that a division of the fleet could lead to 
its destruction. Ukraine is not in a position to maintain such a 
fleet. Thus the fleet is like some independent unit struggling 
for its own survival. And although, it seems to me, the 
decisions of the Supreme Soviet of Russia on the indivisibility 
of the fleet and the status of Sevastopol are insufficiently 
thought out strategically since it is difficult to realize them, 
particularly as far as the transfer of Sevastopol to the 
jurisdiction of Russia is concerned, they were dictated by the 
actual interests of thousands of officers and their families, 
whose fate neither Russia nor Ukraine is in a position to decide 
otherwise. 
  In the opinion of certain Russian politicians, a solution of 
the problem of the Black Sea Fleet could be the preservation of 
Sevastopol as the base of the Russian fleet with Russia being 
given other rear support units and on-shore installations in 
Crimea capable of ensuring the combat capability of the Russian 
part of the Black Sea Fleet with the simultaneous allocation 
from the Black Sea Fleet of a small part for Ukraine with the 
rebasing of this part outside of the Crimean peninsula. 
  Whatever the case, every effort should be made to keep the 
question of the Black Sea Fleet and Crimea a problem of as 
minimal a significance as possible for Russia on the basis of 
the strategic line in respect to Ukraine that it will not be in 
a position in the next few years to build its own statehood 
without closer integration with Russia in this form or the other 
in the economic and military-political spheres. 
  As anticipated, the meeting between Yeltsin and Kravchuk and 
the decisions on these matters were blocked by the Ukrainian 
parliament and once more bore out the opinion that such 
questions as the Black Sea Fleet and Crimea are individual 
tactical questions in the overall strategy of relations between 
Russia and Ukraine. 
  And, in conclusion, literally a few words about the fate of 
Ukraine's nuclear weapons. Despite Ukraine's multiple statements 
concerning its desire to become a nonnuclear power and the 
signing of the Lisbon Agreement in 1992, the present Ukrainian 
leadership has adopted a policy of conversion of the country 
into a nuclear power. This line of behavior is explained and 
justified publicly and privately by Ukrainian politicians by the 
following circumstances. 
  First, Ukraine believes, not without reason, that with the 
elimination of nuclear weapons it will lose a considerable part 
of its significance and possibilities of influencing 
international relations. Put more crudely, it would not have the 
possibility of nuclear blackmail of the world community in order 
to obtain economic assistance. This line is quite well known and 
was employed extensively in the period of Gorbachev's rule, when 
the reason given for the need for assistance to the USSR was the 
fact that it was essential to guarantee a certain level of life 
support to avoid chaos and confusion in a starving country 
packed with nuclear weapons. 
  Second, many Ukrainian politicians and analysts assume that 
the possession of nuclear weapons could guarantee the formation 
of independent Ukrainian statehood, and in this case these 
weapons are perceived as a possible factor against, as they 
believe, the expansionist aspirations of Russia in respect to 
Ukraine. 
  Third, in declaring the nuclear weapons on its territory its 
own property Ukraine wants to obtain its share from the sale of 
the nuclear fuel which could be formed as a result of the 
dismantling of the nuclear missiles. 
  Whatever the motives of the Ukrainian leadership, it would 
seem to me that the presence or absence of nuclear weapons in 
Ukraine is not a serious factor threatening the interests of 
Russia itself. Nor do I believe that Russia should display 
particular zeal in seeking Ukraine's nuclear-free status. Nor, 
simultaneously, should Russia fear possible blackmail on the 
part of the West in that the West might counterpose a Ukraine 
possessing nuclear weapons to Russia. 
  In the event of the close integration of these two states, 
nuclear weapons could only augment the overall power of these 
two states or the CIS as a whole. In the event of Ukraine not 
complying with the Lisbon agreements and the terms of the START 
I Treaty, the possibilities of ratification of the START II 
Agreement between Russia and the United States, which, in the 
opinion of many experts and politicians in Russia, affords the 
United States many advantages, would in practice be undermined. 
  So Ukraine's nuclear status is a headache with uncertain 
consequences both for Ukraine's neighbors in the West and the 
world community as a whole, which they should understand. But 
under no circumstances should Russia engage in this sphere in 
any rash and ill-considered activity, which could cause 
undesirable tension in relations between these two Slav 
countries. 
<H5>  Belarus </H5>
  The reason for this procedure of the consideration of 
Russia's relations initially with Ukraine and then with Belarus 
and Kazakhstan and only then with the other republics is the 
fact that the very day following the disbandment of the USSR 
demands among both politicians and analysts came to be heard 
from all sides concerning the need for some new form of Russia's 
association primarily with these newly formed states since only 
in this case could Russia or the state which might be formed as 
a result of such an association preserve opportunities for 
restoring its global superpower status. 
  Russia's relations with Belarus are distinguished by a 
number 
of particular features. As distinct from Ukraine and the 
republics of the Baltic and the Transcaucasus, the mood in 
support of secession from the USSR and the formation of an 
independent state was not so strong in Belarus. The most radical 
supporters of this line from the People's Front enjoyed 
negligible influence among the people. Another difference 
between Belarus and Ukraine is the fact that there have never in 
this republic been stable anti-Russian sentiments, nor has there 
been profound psychological trauma among the people from 
unrealized Belarusian statehood, which tormented the souls of 
many Ukrainian nationalists throughout the period that Ukraine 
was part of the Russian Empire and, subsequently, of the USSR. 
Aside from this, Belarus felt itself to a greater extent to be 
part of the common Russian linguistic and ethno-cultural habitat 
and whence, to some extent, the independent Republic of Belarus 
emerged, contrary to its wishes, after the Union center had lost 
control of the republics and it was decided to get rid of this 
center in December 1991. 
  Although Belarus is today beginning to acquire a taste for 
republic elite groups, as the leaders of a big independent 
state, the multitude of ties of an ethno-cultural, linguistic, 
and economic nature and the absence of any stable antagonisms 
between the Belarusian and Russian peoples create favorable 
conditions for future closer convergence between Russia and 
Belarus, particularly if it is considered that Belarus receives 
raw material and energy resources mainly from Russia and that 
the market for the sale of finished commodities for this 
republic is Russia also. 
  This also explains Belarus' position on economic and 
military-political questions in relations with Russia. Belarus 
is as yet the only one of the three nuclear republics, aside 
from Russia, which has without any hesitation agreed to put 
under Russia's control the strategic nuclear forces deployed on 
its territory. The republic advocates close cooperation with 
Russia in the military sphere, not least considering the fact 
that everything the Belarusian Army is equipped with is made in 
Russia. Although Belarus has declared itself a nuclear-free 
neutral country which is not a member of any military-political 
blocs, there is in this republic today, nonetheless, serious 
pressure on the part of parliament, and this line is supported 
by Prime Minister Kebich, in the direction of the republic's 
closer military-political integration within the CIS framework. 
This became particularly graphic in the example of the 
discussion of the question in political circles of the 
republic's attitude toward the Collective Security Treaty signed 
by a number of countries of the CIS in Tashkent in 1992. The 
parliament of Belarus required its chairman, Shushkevich, to 
sign this agreement and become a full member of the Collective 
Security Treaty, whereas Shushkevich and the forces supporting 
the chairman of parliament refused to comply with the demands of 
the corps of deputies, giving as their reason for this the fact 
that such a step on the part of Belarus would be a violation of 
the declaration on neutrality and nonparticipation in 
military-political blocs. Parliament Chairman Shushkevich and 
his supporters are afraid that, having subscribed to the 
Collective Security Treaty, the Belarusian armed forces could be 
drawn into foreign wars in Central Asia or the Transcaucasus, 
where, it seems to them, Belarus has no interests which they 
should be defending with armed forces. But these forces are 
interested in a closer military-political alliance with Russia 
on a bilateral basis for the joint protection of the two states' 
common border, the exchange of intelligence information, and the 
creation of an early warning system and in a number of other 
areas of military-political cooperation. The trends toward the 
closer connection of Belarus and Russia and sentiments in 
support of the unification in this form or the other of the 
disintegrated country are so strong in the country that 
Shushkevich's refusal to sign the Tashkent Collective Security 
Treaty just about cost him his job, and the opposition was just 
a few votes shy of removing the present chairman of the Supreme 
Soviet, who had refused to comply with the Supreme Soviet's 
decisions. 
  All these factors testify that there are in Belarus serious 
sentiments in favor of a strengthening of both multilateral 
relations within the framework the CIS as a whole and bilateral 
relations between Russia and Belarus. The culmination in this 
respect was the recent agreement on the conclusion of an 
economic Union of Russia, Ukraine, and Belarus, which was signed 
by the premiers of these three countries and which prepared the 
ground for the development of the provisions of this agreement 
at the September summit in Moscow, where an agreement on 
economic union within the framework of the CIS was concluded and 
a decision on the creation of a single ruble zone, to which 
Belarus subscribed, was adopted. 
  The integration trends that have been manifested almost 
everywhere in the space of the former USSR are prompting 
politicians to find in avoidance of a continuation of the 
economic recession and the collapse of their national economies 
mechanisms of the restoration of the severed ties in order to 
deflect from themselves responsibility for the abrupt 
deterioration in the socioeconomic position of the populace in 
their republics. 
  It is obvious to the vast majority today that 
sovereignization and independence were the cause of the 
catastrophic deterioration in the position of millions of people 
in the republics, where the people were not ready to make such 
sacrifices for the sake of sovereignty and independence. 
Considering all these sentiments, many politicians in the 
republics, and this may be observed both in Belarus and in 
Ukraine, are attempting to come to terms with these changed 
sentiments and to play in the political struggle with one 
another the card of the changed mood in support of integration 
processes within the framework of the former Soviet Union. 
  This is being manifested particularly graphically in the 
overt and covert rivalry between the leaders of the legislative 
and executive organs of power in Russia, Belarus, and Ukraine. 
In these three republics the premiers are acting as the 
catalysts of these integration processes, enhancing here their 
popularity and building up their political capital. It cannot be 
ruled out that the psychological factor that Yeltsin, 
Shushkevich, and Kravchuk are in the eyes of the public to blame 
for the disintegration of the unified state and personify 
separatism and sovereignization is working to their advantage 
also. 
  It is not least this rivalry also which in Russia between 
president and parliament, in Belarus between Shushkevich and 
Prime Minister Kebich, and in Ukraine between Kravchuk and 
Kuchma is forcing Yeltsin, Shushkevich, and Kravchuk, lest they 
hand over a monopoly on integration to their political 
opponents, to appreciably adjust their positions in the 
direction of support for closer integration processes within the 
framework of the CIS. 
  This is why the contradiction between the legislature and 
the 
executive, particularly in Russia, has on the one hand played a 
positive and, on the other, a negative part for the formation of 
an adequate policy in respect to the integration trends that 
have been manifested in the former republics of the Soviet 
Union. Attempting to extract public applause and act the part of 
unifying force of the old state, the Supreme Soviet of Russia 
was prepared to make serious concessions in the economic sphere 
for the achievement of these goals, considering these republics' 
present considerable dependence on Russia in the financial, 
economic, and military-political spheres. 
  Whereas, considering the difficult position of Russia itself 
in the economy, the government was not prepared to agree to 
reckless concessions in the economic sphere without tangible 
benefits in the military-political and integration spheres. 
  Thus the central trend in Russia's relations with Belarus is 
movement in the direction of closer military-political and 
economic integration, which, with a favorable development of the 
political situation in Russia, could create a stable union of 
Russia and Belarus as a dependable nucleus within the framework 
of the CIS. And the final point of which mention should be made 
in the relations of Russia and Belarus is that the integration 
trends, at this stage, within the framework of the CIS, at 
least, are considerably reducing the threat of the advance into 
Belarus of third countries to the detriment of Russia's 
interests and are making unlikely the possibilities of the 
formation of a Baltic-Black Sea commonwealth, in which a key 
component was to be Belarus for the purpose of the isolation of 
Russia and the creation of a cordon sanitaire between Russia and 
the rest of Europe. 
<H5>  Kazakhstan </H5>
  By virtue of a number of factors of a geopolitical, 
ethno-cultural, and military nature, Kazakhstan occupies a 
special place in Russia's foreign policy. It is no accident 
that, as observed above, with all the possible configurations 
pertaining to the organization of the post-Soviet space, 
politicians and analysts of various persuasions unequivocally 
consider essential the enlistment of Kazakhstan in the closest 
possible economic and political relations with Russia. This is 
explained not only by the vastness of the territory of this 
republic and its resources, the presence of nuclear weapons on 
its territory, and Russia's geopolitical interests in this 
region, but primarily also by the fact that Russians constitute 
almost 40 percent of the population of Kazakhstan, which is 
equal to the numbers of Kazakhs in this republic. It should be 
noted that Nazarbayev, president of Kazakhstan, also clearly 
recognizes the potential threat of this ethno-demographic 
situation. This explains to a considerable extent the fact that 
Nazarbayev consistently advocates the preservation and 
strengthening of the CIS and the creation of coordinating 
economic and military-political structures within the framework 
of the CIS, understanding full well that the total exclusiveness 
of Kazakhstan as an independent state fenced off from Russia by 
guarded borders, customs, and a local regime would inevitably 
lead to the division of this state along ethnic lines. In 
addition, there are in Russia quite influential forces which do 
not recognize the territorial integrity of Kazakhstan and the 
existing borders between it and Russia, considering North 
Kazakhstan, which is populated chiefly by Russians and Russian 
speakers, a natural part of Russia. The particular 
ethno-cultural situation in Kazakhstan makes an appreciable 
imprint on the choice of the policy line of Nazarbayev and the 
present Kazakh leadership. They have to pursue a virtuoso policy 
in order, while displaying assertiveness within the CIS 
framework and acting the part of defenders of the trends of 
integration with Russia, not to cause open antagonism on the 
part of elite groups in Russia. It has to be said that 
Nazarbayev has been preeminently successful in gratifying both 
right and left, both democrats and patriots, both President 
Yeltsin and the Supreme Soviet of the Russian Federation by his 
political line aimed at the preservation of a common post-Soviet 
economic and military-political space. This aspect of 
Nazarbayev's policy is the most extensively publicized aspect, 
although little is said about the fact that it is largely 
explained not by a love for or loyalty toward Russia but, 
rather, by the presence of the explosive factors mentioned above. 
  But Kazakhstan is also pursuing here another policy, one 
that 
is less publicized, but that is not escaping the attention of 
observers and analysts and has a different orientation and 
different goals. While paying lip service to the integration 
trends within the framework of the CIS and the orientation 
toward Russia and being simultaneously an Asian state with a 
Muslim titular population, Kazakhstan is attempting to use its 
own economic and military-political potential in order to find 
for itself a place in the community of Turkic states. Kazakhstan 
is displaying great assertiveness in this sphere in respect to 
the consolidation of the Central Asian, predominantly Turkic, 
states and, simultaneously, supporting these states' orientation 
toward Turkey. 
  Thus having a highly vulnerable ethno-cultural makeup, 
Kazakhstan is attempting to find for itself a niche in different 
communities simultaneously. 
  At the same time, on the other hand, the framework of this 
second policy accommodates a number of measures that are being 
implemented by the Kazakh leadership to strengthen the national 
statehood of this new formation. Pertaining to such measures 
first and foremost are the decisions that have been adopted on 
the announcement of Kazakh as the official language, whereas 
Kazakhs constitute less than half of the population of the 
republic. Kazakhs are simultaneously being moved from the 
southern oblasts of the republic and from Mongolia to the 
territories of the Northwest in order to change the 
ethno-demographic situation in this region. Throughout the North 
and in the Northwest the names of cities and communities founded 
by Russians as the Urals and Siberia were colonized are being 
changed. The state authorities of Kazakhstan have virtually 
driven underground organizations of the Southern Urals Cossacks 
and are pursuing a most brutal policy of suppression of all 
actions which could cause interethnic discord and unconcealed 
separatist opposition. Without consideration of this second line 
in Kazakhstan's foreign and domestic policy it is impossible to 
correctly understand and evaluate either the line in 
Nazarbayev's policy which is oriented toward the preservation 
with Russia of close integration ties in all vitally important 
spheres. 
  Considering the possibilities of a change in the 
ethno-demographic situation in this republic in connection with 
the difference in the birthrate among Russians and Kazakhs and 
the existence of the stream of refugees from Kazakhstan, who, 
under the influence of the events in Tajikistan and many other 
interethnic clashes in the republics of Central Asia, are, 
fearful for themselves and their children's future, leaving in 
good time this potentially explosive region, it cannot be ruled 
out that Kazakhstan will within a relatively short period of 
time have succeeded in radically changing the ethno-national 
composition in favor of the titular nationality. 
  At the present, as we observed in the introductory part of 
this work, although there are objective difficulties in the 
shaping of foreign policy priorities in relation to various 
republics of the former Union on the part of Russia, one has the 
impression that the present Russian leadership, understanding 
the vulnerability of this republic, recognizes the possibilities 
of influence on Kazakhstan's foreign policy line. In my view, 
this explains also the fact that Russia, being at the initial 
stage of the formation of its statehood, was at the end of 
1991-start of 1992 itself uninterested in the molding of 
integration processes within the CIS, fearing that Ukraine, 
Kazakhstan, and states of the CIS might unite in the 
coordinating structures of the CIS and become a counterweight to 
Russia within the Commonwealth. 
  It is this that could explain the fact that Russia pursued 
throughout 1992, despite the formal preservation of the CIS, a 
policy of the strengthening of its own statehood and of a shift 
of the center of gravity in relations with the former Union 
republic members of the CIS from a multilateral to a bilateral 
basis, clearly recognizing that, being manifestly stronger in 
the economic and military-political respects than each republic 
of the former Union individually, Russia could achieve more 
advantageous positions for itself in these relations. And it is 
not fortuitous that it is after the relative stabilization of 
the financial and economic situation in Russia itself and the 
virtual collapse of the financial and economic systems of the 
former republics that Russia, with stronger positions, has been 
attempting to stimulate new integration processes within the CIS 
framework. It is in the channel of this strategy that Russia, to 
prevent the appearance of a serious counterbalance to itself 
within the framework of the CIS, is attempting to gradually 
build up the nucleus of the Commonwealth. It is no accident that 
the problem of an economic union between Russia and Belarus was 
discussed first, therefore. Ukraine was forced to associate with 
it, and only then were Kazakhstan and the other members of the 
CIS plugged in. 
  I would like in conclusion to dwell on one further sphere of 
the mutual relations of Russia and Kazakhstan. I am talking 
about the Kazakh nuclear weapons. And on this matter Kazakhstan 
occupies an intermediate position compared with Belarus and 
Ukraine. It does not lay claim to nuclear status and is not 
declaring these weapons its property but nor is it formally 
transferring these weapons to the control of Russia, although 
the weapons are in fact under the control of Russia. Both the 
nuclear weapons and the Baykonur space complex are being used 
and may subsequently be used as factors of bargaining and 
pressure on Russia. But since the Russian leadership recognizes 
Kazakhstan's lack of interest in creating tension in relations 
between the two countries, it is treating the possible fate of 
the nuclear weapons and the space complex in Kazakhstan with 
relative composure. 
<H5>  Moldova </H5>
  Before turning to an examination of the nature of Russia's 
relations with the three main regions of the former 
Union--Central Asia, the Baltic, and the Transcaucasus--we 
should briefly define the nature of the relationship of Russia 
and Moldova. 
  The development of relations with this small republic has 
had 
a big impact both on the domestic policy process in Russia and 
in the change in the Russian political establishment's 
understanding of Russia's role in the post-Soviet space. As 
observed above, the end of 1991 and, particularly, the period 
immediately following the Belovezha agreements was characterized 
for Russian society and the new democratic leadership by a 
desire to walk away from all the conflict zones and foreign 
interethnic wars, which had begun under Gorbachev even within 
the framework of the old Union and in which young boys from 
Russian peacekeeping forces had died. The "Afghan syndrome" led 
to the opinion that, following the disintegration of the USSR, 
Russia has neither specific goals nor interests outside of the 
Russian Federation. This was manifested particularly vividly in 
the example of the Karabakh conflict, when both public opinion 
and the Russian leadership decided that the loss of Russian 
soldiers in a war alien to Russia made no sense and 
unequivocally supported the withdrawal of Russian troops both 
from Armenia and Azerbaijan and from Karabakh. This was a 
demonstration that Russia had neither the forces nor the desire 
to become entrenched in this region. 
  As already observed, the Foreign Ministry and the new 
Russian 
state were prepared to make this principle the basis of foreign 
policy with all the former republics of the Union. But it very 
quickly became obvious that what had worked in the case of 
Karabakh, where a lengthy and bloody war had been going on for a 
long time and where Russia's presence at the time of the 
withdrawal of the troops was undesirable both on the part of the 
two Transcaucasus republics and public opinion and political 
elite groups of the vast majority of Russians, was not working 
in the case of Moldova and Georgia, albeit for different 
reasons. We will have more to say about Russia's relations with 
Georgia, but the attempts, meanwhile, on the part of the 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs of the Russian Federation to pursue 
in Moldova and Georgia a policy analogous with Karabakh ran into 
various obstacles. It had become obvious under Gorbachev even, 
during discussion of the question of the possibilities of the 
conclusion of a new Union treaty, that as a counterweight to the 
separatist trends of the Union republics and the "sovereignty 
parade," the Union center had begun to play the card of existing 
national-territorial autonomies or of new ones about to be 
formed as a lever of pressure on the republics in the event of 
their attempting to secede from the USSR. 
  Thus prior to the disintegration of the Union even two 
self-proclaimed republics: Dniester and Gagauz, had been formed 
within the Moldavian Republic. In addition, conflicts between 
the Dniester region and Chisinau, which developed into armed 
clashes between Tiraspol and Chisinau, had begun within the 
framework of the Union even. The conflict was of an 
ethno-cultural nature, and besides the threat of Romanianization 
within Moldova itself, the Slav part of the population of the 
Dniester region was threatened by incorporation in Romania since 
activists from the People's Front were earnestly pursuing the 
policy line of the unification of Moldova and Romania. 
  The conflict in the Dniester region affected the interests 
of 
both Russia and Ukraine since ethnic Russians and Ukrainians 
found themselves involved in it. Ukraine occupied a position of 
neutrality in this conflict. Encroachment on Moldova's 
territorial integrity was unacceptable for it since this could 
have created a dangerous precedent for Ukraine itself. 
Immediately following the announcement of Ukraine's 
independence, both Russia itself and Crimea began to raise the 
question of territories and the borders between Russia and 
Ukraine. Russia, on the other hand, was in a very tricky 
position. On the one hand it recognized Moldova's independence, 
on the other, the war that had begun between Tiraspol and 
Chisinau had come to be used by the opposition against Yeltsin 
and the democrats in the struggle for power in Russia itself, 
and the leadership could not simply have ignored the fate of the 
Russians who had become party to this military conflict. The 
situation was further complicated for Russia by the fact that it 
has no direct border with the Dniester region, and much depended 
on the position of Ukraine since the Russian 14th Army stationed 
on the territory of the Dniester region was supplied via the 
territory of Ukraine, in the main. 
  At the start of 1992 the Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs 
attempted to escape direct involvement in the conflict. To this 
end Russian diplomacy attempted to enlist international 
organizations in a resolution of the conflict. Attempting to 
internationalize the problem, Russia agreed to participate in 
multilateral negotiations within the CSCE framework. The 
peacemaking efforts within the CSCE framework and the attempts 
to internationalize the Dniester problem produced no results 
since none of the parties involved in a settlement of the 
conflict agreed to the participation of representatives of the 
Dniester Republic in the multilateral negotiations. The war, 
meanwhile, became increasingly bitter and large-scale. The war 
in the Dniester region was a catalyst of the domestic political 
struggle in Russia. Volunteers, particularly Cossacks from 
Southern Russia, set out for the conflict zone from all of 
Russia. The patriotic and neocommunist press and political 
circles in the Supreme Soviet accused the Yeltsin administration 
of the betrayal of Russians who had against their wishes found 
themselves abroad on account of the disintegration of the USSR. 
It was on the Dniester issue that Vice President Rutskoy for the 
first time openly occupied a position of criticism of the 
Foreign Ministry and Minister Kozyrev, accusing him of a failure 
to understand national interests and the Foreign Ministry's lack 
of a deliberate policy in relation to the "near abroad." 
  It should be considered that the escalation of the conflict 
in the Dniester region coincided with the peak of the shock 
therapy being implemented by the Gaydar government and that by 
this time many politicians in parliament and in the presidential 
structures had begun to distance themselves from the domestic 
policy of Yeltsin and his team and to score points among the 
public here, presenting themselves as defenders of the people's 
interests. Competition among the vice president, Supreme Soviet 
Chairman Khasbulatov, and the irreconcilable opposition as to 
who could derive the most benefits from criticism of the policy 
of the president and the government began. In this open 
demarcation on questions of economic reform a pretext for 
demarcation on foreign policy matters was added also. The first 
such matter was the military conflict in the Dniester region and 
the approaches of various politicians in Russia in respect to a 
resolution of this conflict. 
  In the spring of 1992 at the Sixth Congress of People's 
Deputies the government was subjected to withering criticism on 
account of the economic policy it was pursuing, and the Foreign 
Ministry and Kozyrev, on account of Russia's "toothless" policy 
in the Dniester region. Rutskoy, Khasbulatov, and the opposition 
in the Supreme Soviet stood for a harder line in relation to 
Moldova and the exclusion of Romania from the negotiating 
process and insisted on a direct dialogue between Tiraspol and 
Chisinau. The Supreme Soviet, in the shape of its majority 
consisting of the opposition and the vice president, supported, 
in fact, the operations of General Lebed, commander of the 
Russian 14th Army, who threatened to march on Chisinau and who 
actively involved the Russian Army in the conflict between 
Chisinau and Tiraspol on the side of the Dniester people. 
  Originally this policy in relation to an independent state 
recognized by the international community, Moldova, was 
unacceptable to the Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs and the 
radical democrats for a number of reasons. First, it could have 
led to the Yugoslavization of the former USSR, which would have 
strengthened the positions of the military, patriotic, and 
neocommunist forces calling for the restoration of the Union. 
Second, such a policy could have caused serious complications 
between Russia and the countries of the "near and far abroad," 
intimidating both with the fact that Russia was endeavoring to 
restore the old empire. But after the Western countries, 
frightened that some drastic steps against Russia on account of 
the operations of the 14th Army in the Dniester region would 
under the conditions of destabilization and the polarization of 
forces in Russia and the condemnation of the social base of 
Yeltsin and the democrats on account of the shock therapy be an 
additional burden on the shoulders of the as yet infirm power 
structures led by the democrats, had refrained from serious 
protests to Russia, the Foreign Ministry position also began to 
change in the direction of unconditional defense of the Dniester 
republic and direct negotiations between Tiraspol and Chisinau. 
Today, in fact, all political forces in Russia occupy close 
positions on the question of relations with Moldova, making 
these relations dependent on Chisinau's policy in relation to 
the Dniester region. Russia's support for the Dniester Republic 
has to a large extent been a factor complicating the process of 
the unification of Moldova and Romania, whereby Moldova would be 
deprived forever of the Dniester region. The Dniester factor 
will for a long time to come seriously influence the nature of 
Russian-Moldovan relations until the status of this 
self-proclaimed republic has been determined. Not least is this 
factor, together with others, today prompting the Moldovan 
leadership to join the CIS. 
  To conclude this section I would like to mention one further 
circumstance which, possibly, played an important part and will 
in the future do the same in relations between Russia and 
Moldova. I am talking about Ukraine. It cannot be ruled out that 
the change in Ukraine's position in respect to the Dniester 
conflict is connected with a tacit understanding between Russia 
and Ukraine, according to which the incorporation in time of 
this territory, in the event of the unification of Moldova and 
Romania, in Ukraine was, possibly, contemplated. The set of 
problems that today lie on Russia's shoulders in connection with 
the Dniester region would be transferred to Ukraine here. 
Ukraine would obtain here an increase in its territory and human 
and material resources, and Russia, an additional region within 
Ukraine with a strong gravitation toward Russia. 
<H5>  The Baltic </H5>
  Russia's relations with the Baltic republics occupy a 
special 
place in Russia's foreign policy in the "near abroad." Many 
factors go to explain this. Mention should be made among them of 
the proximity of this region to West and North Europe, the 
experience of independent statehood between the two world wars, 
integration in the Union as a result of the 1939 
Molotov-Ribbentrop Pact, the United States' nonrecognition of 
the legality of the incorporation of the Baltic republics in the 
USSR, the presence of an active lobby in the United States 
advocating American support for these countries in their 
relations with Russia, and a number of others. Aside from those 
mentioned, two further factors, which were recognized back in 
the period of perestroyka, when the Baltic countries raised for 
the first time the question of secession from the Union, would 
appear very serious. It is a question of the presence of 
millions of Russian speakers in these republics and of their 
fate following these republics' achievement of full independence 
and of Russia's special geopolitical interests in this region, 
since the ports and lines of communication of the Baltic were 
Russia's outlet not only to the West but also to Kaliningrad 
Oblast, which has in this case become an enclave territory. 
Considering all these factors, and not only as a result of an 
obdurate aspiration to preserve the integrity of the Union at 
all costs, Gorbachev and his circle considered it essential that 
the divorce suit take at least five years. 
  This period of time was needed for the solution, in the 
event 
of a clear expression of the will of these peoples to 
independence, of such serious questions as the property and 
interethnic questions, questions of citizenship and the status 
of the troops and military bases, and the fate of the ports and 
the lines of communication. Although Gorbachev was sharply 
criticized at that time on the part of the democrats, who 
considered that his real purpose was merely preservation of the 
empire, it is in practice obvious even to the schoolboy today 
that the wholesale severance of relations and Russia's instant 
recognition, following the failure of the putsch, of the 
independence of the Baltic republics was a serious mistake, 
which resulted both in serious complications for the Russians 
and Russian speakers in these republics and the continuation of 
tension in relations between Russia and these countries in the 
solution of questions of the withdrawal of the troops and arms 
from these republics and in the determination of the status of 
the Russian speakers in the sphere of property and political 
relations. Today many people in Russia, particularly from the 
camp of the opposition to Yeltsin, are accusing the United 
States and the West of having been very quick to recognize the 
independence of these republics and of having contributed to the 
disintegration of the USSR, which has led to the kindling of 
interethnic conflicts and wars. 
  However, we should agree with the American Sovietologist D. 
Simes, who, participating in the "Red Square" Russian television 
program, observed that the main blame for the recognition of the 
former Union republics without the preliminary resolution of 
problems of the citizenship and property rights of the 
Russian-speaking population in these republics, particularly in 
the Baltic, lies with the present leadership of Russia, not the 
West, since the United States and the Western countries 
recognized these republics only after Russia had done so. And 
the naivete and dilettantism of the new Russian leadership show 
through in the case of the rash recognition of the Baltic 
republics, as is now obvious even to one who is an ignoramus in 
international relations. 
  The calculation was that deliverance from the hated center, 
against which the democrats had fought, both in Russia and in 
the Baltic, would afford the allies in this anti-imperial 
struggle an opportunity to build interstate relations with one 
another amicably and on democratic foundations. The Russian 
leadership was visibly counting here on gratitude on the part of 
the leaders of these republics for their liberation since the 
main part for the demolition of the Union and the liberation of 
the other republics had been assumed by Russia. Nor can it be 
forgotten here that it was on the basis of this understanding of 
serenity in relations with these republics that the Russian 
leadership, when the Union was still in existence even, 
concluded treaties with them. 
  True, at the time of the signing of these treaties Russia 
itself was not yet a state in the direct meaning of this word 
since the Union leadership controlled all the power structures 
and the economy of Russia, and there was scant likelihood that 
these treaties would ever really determine relations between 
Russia and the Baltic republics. But the impossible occurred. 
The Union fell apart, and Russia and the Baltic republics were 
independent states with agreements which failed to provide for 
the resolution of a tangled knot of military, political, 
national, property, and other problems. 
  Immediately following the disintegration of the USSR, the 
leaders of the Baltic republics lost no opportunity to show 
their democratic allies in the struggle against Gorbachev's 
center that not only did they not feel any gratitude in respect 
to democratic Russia but that they altogether drew no special 
distinction between the present Russia and the USSR. It was 
particularly offensive for both democrats in Russia and many 
Russians in these republics who had supported the movement of 
"people's fronts" in these republics hearing that both the 
Russian troops and the Russian-speaking population in these 
republics were occupiers, who had to be gotten rid of as quickly 
as possible. The accelerated formation of ethnocratic states, 
particularly in Latvia and Estonia, with the exclusion from the 
ranks of citizens of more than 1.5 million of the nonindigenous 
population, plus the immediate demands for the withdrawal of 
Russian troops immediately complicated relations between Russia 
and the Baltic republics, threatening to influence Russia's 
relations with the United States and other Western countries 
also. 
  Let us examine in more detail these two groups of problems: 
citizenship and troop withdrawal, which have become a stumbling 
block and are hampering the normalization of Russia's relations 
with this region. Let us start with the problems of citizenship. 
A very great deal has already been said about this, and without 
going into details, therefore, I will merely note in outline 
what this problem represents for Russia. In practically all 
social strata and among political elite groups representing the 
entire spectrum of political forces in Russia there is agreement 
on the question of the fact that Russians and other ethnically 
nonindigenous groups in Latvia and Estonia have become 
second-class citizens and that racist regimes are being 
installed in these republics for the purpose of squeezing out 
"foreigners" into Russia and a change in the ethno-demographic 
situation in favor of the indigenous population. This problem 
has become a serious factor in Russia's domestic political life 
and an instrument in the hands of the opposition in the struggle 
against the Yeltsin administration and, particularly, the 
Foreign Ministry and Kozyrev. 
  There is a danger that the "extrusion" of Russians will 
either lead to tens and hundreds of thousands of people, having 
left the Baltic, supplementing the ranks of refugees who have 
already arrived from the Transcaucasus and Central Asia and 
becoming fertile material for the patriotic and neocommunist 
forces, which will use them for their own purposes. Or, on the 
other hand, the situation could develop in accordance with the 
Dniester region scenario, and the events in Estonia show that 
the formation of ethno-territorial formations in the areas of 
the compact residence of the Russian-speaking population in the 
northeast of the republic cannot be ruled out. It is perfectly 
obvious here that no government in Russia could remain 
indifferent were conflicts and clashes to begin between Russian 
speakers and Estonians on the border with Russia. 
  The problem of the Russian speakers in the Baltic has 
spotlighted one further important problem. The position of the 
United States and the West on this issue has largely influenced 
a change in the mood in Russia in the broadest political circles 
in relation to these countries. It has become obvious to many 
people that the problem of human rights and a commitment to the 
principles of respect for these rights are not for the West a 
universal fundamental line of behavior and that it was used 
merely against the Soviet Union, as American liberals of the 
left said, as an ideological stick to break up the Soviet 
Empire. The United States and Western countries have displayed 
an almost total disregard for the problems of the rights of the 
Russian speakers and have not lifted a finger to influence the 
nationalist governments of Latvia and Estonia. 
  Instead such strategists and analysts as H. Kissinger, P. 
Goble, and others have maintained in a number of publications 
and speeches at international conferences and seminars that the 
West's reluctance to take up in earnest the defense of Russian 
speakers in the Baltic is connected with the fact that Russia is 
allegedly artificially raising the problem of the Russian 
speakers, that this is camouflage for its real purposes, and 
that by using this factor it is attempting to restore the 
empire. Nor have Russian interests in the question of defense of 
the rights of the Russian-speaking population been supported 
within the UN or CSCE framework either. Mention should, of 
course, be made here also of the serious fault of the Foreign 
Ministry and Kozyrev, minister of foreign affairs, who has 
failed to properly convey to Western leaders the degree of 
importance of this question for the survival of the present 
leadership of Russia in the domestic political struggle. 
  During the discussion of these questions at a 
Russian-American conference in Moscow in September 1992, F. 
Fukuyama and S. Sestanovich expressed in conversation with me 
bewilderment at the opposition's unhappiness in connection with 
the West's policy and observed that if the West is not taking 
account of Russia's interests to the proper extent, this is 
largely explained by the fact that the Russian foreign policy 
department is formulating them and defending them insufficiently 
clearly in its contacts with its partners in the United States 
and West Europe. Kozyrev's belated bellicose statements have 
failed to bring about any serious changes in the positions of 
Western countries or the Baltic leaders. The action of the 
Council of Europe on acceptance of Estonia as a member of this 
organization was perceived as a slap in the face for Russia. 
  An angry letter to this organization sent by Minister 
Kozyrev 
in connection with Estonia's admittance as a member of this 
organization was not even vouchsafed the attention of leading 
circles of the Council of Europe, and Catherine Lalumiere, the 
chairman of this organization, observed ironically in the 
lobbies of the Council of Europe that this letter had been sent 
by Kozyrev mainly for domestic consumption in order that he 
might show himself in the eyes of the opposition to be a fighter 
for the rights of the Russian speakers in the Baltic. 
  This position has now alerted both moderate and centrist 
circles concerning the true aims of Western countries in 
relation to Russia. This position of the Western countries on 
the question of human rights appears particularly suspicious 
against the background of these countries' very great 
assertiveness on another key issue--the withdrawal of the troops 
from the Baltic. 
  Russia is experiencing on this matter constant pressure, the 
linkage of economic assistance with an acceleration of the troop 
withdrawal, and the activation of UN and CSCE mechanisms. 
  This position of the West cannot fail to evoke serious 
suspicions in Russia. The Baltic is a sphere of Russia's 
geopolitical interests. The Baltic countries have raised 
repeatedly the question of the possibilities of the creation of 
a Baltic-Black Sea commonwealth. These ideas have been supported 
by a number of influential strategists and politicians in the 
United States and in the West, and the departure of Russian 
troops from this region without determination of the future 
nature of this region and the fate of hundreds of thousands of 
the Russian-speaking population represents a difficult choice 
for Russia. 
  Even if a cordon sanitaire by way of the design of a 
Baltic-Black Sea commonwealth is not created, the calls of 
influential politicians in these republics concerning possible 
membership of NATO or the acquisition of some security 
guarantees from NATO are evoking serious suspicions in Russia. 
  It would seem to me that although there is much that has 
been 
let slip by the Russian leadership for a regularization of 
relations with the Baltic countries on questions of the civil 
rights of the Russian speakers, the status of the Russian 
troops, and the fate of the military bases, it is perfectly 
obvious that the position on all these matters even in the 
present government is becoming increasingly hard-line since 
doubts are appearing in Russia's political circles as to their 
Western partners' sincerity when it comes to considering 
Russia's geopolitical and military-strategic interests in this 
region and contributing in conjunction with Russia to the 
defense of the rights of the Russian speakers by the local 
authorities. The abrupt movements of the Baltic republics in 
these two key spheres, the rights of the Russian speakers and 
military-strategic matters, could cause a complication of 
Russia's relations with these republics, and the refusal of the 
United States and other Western countries to effectively 
demonstrate a regard for Russia's interests in this region would 
be a factor contributing to a growth of distrust of the United 
States and other Western countries as regards their true 
purposes and intentions in relation to Russia and would 
strengthen the position of those who advocate the restoration of 
the empire within the old borders. The Western countries still 
have an opportunity to influence the domestic political process 
in Russia and to support the present leadership and its domestic 
and, particularly, foreign policy. This opportunity is afforded 
them in the case of the Russian-Baltic contradictions and 
conflicts. No one is demanding of the Western countries the 
unequivocal defense of Russian interests. All that is required 
is the adoption of a position of equal distance from the parties 
to the conflict and a consideration of the interests of Russia 
as, still, a great power. 
<H5>  Central Asia </H5>
  The events unfolding on the Tajik-Afghan border and the 
tumultuous debate in the Russian press concerning Russia's 
possible policy in respect to this conflict and region in 
Central Asia as a whole has manifested once again the entire 
complexity and painfulness of the possible adoption by Russia of 
decisions of both a strategic and tactical nature. It seems 
obvious to many people that Russia has simply not defined its 
policy in relation to Central Asia and, in particular, in 
relation to the hottest point of this region--Tajikistan. Others 
believe that, following the events at the Moscow border post, at 
which Russian border guards died, Russia has at the very least 
formulated a certain strategy in respect to the region, meaning 
the statement of five states--Russia, Uzbekistan, Kazakhstan, 
Kyrgyzstan, Tajikistan, and Turkmenistan--on measures to 
stabilize the Tajik-Afghan border and the Declaration on the 
Inviolability of Borders, which records: the Tajik-Afghan border 
shall be deemed the border of the CIS and shall be defended 
collectively. 
  Perfectly justified opinions to the effect that Russia's 
chosen strategy at this stage in relation to the Tajik-Afghan 
conflict could in the future seamlessly pull Russia into an 
endless and bloody war with immense outlays of material and 
human resources without any chance of a propitious outcome of 
the war, defeat in which would result in catastrophe for the 
young Russian democracy and the market reforms, are being 
expressed also. The supporters of this view believe that Russia, 
with its allies in Central Asia, would not be in a position to 
hold the 1,400 km of the Tajik-Afghan border. 
  Having noted in brief the essence of the arguments "for" and 
"against" Russia's involvement in the conflicts in Central Asia, 
we should examine the factors that are prompting Russian 
analysts and politicians to support at this stage Moscow's 
decisions on the announcement of the Tajik border as the forward 
frontier of the CIS. It should be noted that, following the 
Russian parliament's ratification of the 1992 Tashkent 
Collective Security Treaty, the parties undertake to render one 
another military support in the event of any subscriber to the 
treaty being subjected to aggression or armed attack. 
  It is obvious that the prolonged misgivings of the Russian 
members of parliament and the reluctance to ratify this 
agreement were explained largely by fears that armed conflicts 
arising in "flash points" of the former Union between republics 
of the former Union that had signed the treaty with their 
neighbors, which would signify the automatic involvement of 
Russia in a war with the countries, contrary to its own wishes 
and interests, could not be ruled out. Although, on the other 
hand, the ratification of this treaty formalized de facto and de 
jure Russia's special claims to the role of guarantor and 
stabilizer of the geopolitical space of the former USSR and 
confirmed the opinion expressed by analysts and politicians that 
the entire space of the former USSR is a sphere of Russia's 
vital interests. 
  But, in my view, it is in respect to this region that the 
strategic aims and interests of Russia, including an 
understanding of this region as a sphere of Russia's vital 
interests, should have been more carefully considered. This 
region has, in my view, a number of particular features which 
demand closer analysis, after which the long-term and short-term 
foreign policy line in relation to it could have been finally 
formulated. 
  The supporters of Russia's more active presence in this 
region justify their position primarily by the presence there of 
millions of Russians. Let us briefly see how serious a problem 
this is in the long-term and short-term perspectives. Truly, as 
of this time Russians constitute more than 2.5 million persons 
in the countries of this region. It is obvious that the Russian 
population has no prospect of survival in these countries in the 
long term. According to the data of sociological studies, the 
level of migration mobility currently fluctuates, with the 
exception of Turkmenistan, between the extreme level--in 
Tajikistan--and a very high level--in Uzbekistan and Kyrgyzstan. 
This is explained by a number of factors: the danger to one's 
life on account of unconcealed military conflicts, the 
Islamization of the way of life, the deterioration in the 
conditions for career advancement and the possibilities of 
acquiring higher education for the nonindigenous population, and 
the qualification of the rights of the nonindigenous population 
in the process of privatization, the purchase of land, 
entrepreneurial activity, and the imparting of official status 
to the indigenous language, which is complicating the 
possibilities of the Russian and Russian-speaking population 
adapting to the changed conditions. 
  Aside from all this, mention should be made of one further 
very important fact. Historical experience shows that Russians 
accustomed to identifying with the Russian Empire and, 
subsequently, with the Soviet state also are not accustomed to 
finding themselves in the role of nonstate, nonindigenous 
nation. Having become overnight a nonindigenous nation in the 
"near abroad," deprived of direct state support, and, in 
addition, in a different cultural and linguistic environment, 
Russians, as a rule, display extreme inefficiency and an 
incapacity for rapid nonstate, spontaneous-social 
self-organization. This makes them highly vulnerable in a 
political and sociocultural respect even in the republics where 
their numbers are almost equal or only barely inferior to the 
indigenous nation. Such is the situation in Estonia, Latvia, and 
Kazakhstan. This is why it is not surprising that where they 
constitute up to 10-15 percent of the population they have 
practically no chance of organization of their ethnic group as 
an effective political force. 
  It should be considered here that in Central Asia, 
particularly, they are concentrated in urban industrial centers, 
inadequately interconnected, and, in fact, dissolved among the 
indigenous population. Thus with the disintegration of the USSR 
and the formation of independent states the Russian population 
has, by virtue of objective and subjective factors, been 
deprived of the possibility of an equal and full-blooded life in 
this region, as a consequence of which the vast majority of the 
Russian population will sooner or later leave Central Asia. 
Russians will hold on in this region merely in the event of the 
restoration of a unified state. But it is unlikely that the old 
totalitarian regime throughout the territory of the former USSR 
could be restored, and, on the other hand, even could this be 
done, it would hardly be worth Russia's while attempting to 
achieve this in the case of Central Asia. The demographic and 
ethno-cultural factors indicate that the 150 year-plus attempt 
of the Russian Empire and, subsequently, of the Soviet Union 
also to integrate this region and these peoples in a single 
linguistic and cultural space has failed. 
  If it is considered that in Russia today the demographic 
situation is highly disturbing on account of mortality exceeding 
the birthrate, it is obvious that, with the present rate of 
demographic growth of the Muslim population of Central Asia, 
radical changes in the demographic situation in favor of the 
non-Russian, primarily Muslim, population could be expected very 
quickly within the framework of a unified state such as was the 
USSR, which would create a serious threat of an intensification 
of an ethno-cultural and religious crisis within the framework 
of the unified state on account of the impossibility of the 
integration within the framework of a common language and 
culture of two nations roughly equal in terms of numbers, 
language, and religion: the Russian-Christian and the 
Turkic-Islamic. This is why, in my view, the defection from 
Russia of the four Central Asian republics means strategically 
in a sense the prevention of possible more serious problems for 
Russia and Russians. 
  Thus Russia should hardly in the long term be seeking the 
integration of this region in a given state with Russia on a 
federative basis, yet preserving here with the states of this 
region, of course, close economic and military-political 
relations. As far as the Russian and Russian-speaking 
nonindigenous population is concerned, a plan of special 
operations to provide for their move to Russia for the further 
strengthening of ethno-cultural unity and the improvement of the 
demographic situation in Russia should be drawn up even now. It 
is by no means obligatory to move the entire Russian-speaking 
population all at once. We should start by helping to fix up the 
approximately 200,000 Russians left in Tajikistan. This would 
afford Russia freedom of maneuver both in its operations in 
Tajikistan and for the immediate future throughout Central Asia. 
  The absence of the factor of the Russian population in 
Tajikistan would remove the problem of the guarding of the 
Tajik-Afghan border since the presence of Russia in this 
republic today signifies not its protection against aggression 
but direct involvement in a civil war, in which it will 
inevitably come up against the opposition of many close and 
distant contiguous Muslim countries. In my view, and this is 
borne out by specialists studying this region, the threat of 
Islamic fundamentalism both for Tajikistan and Central Asia as a 
whole and for Russia particularly is manifestly exaggerated. In 
my view, Russia's involvement in this conflict could only 
increase this threat. In actual fact, granted the preservation 
of Islamic traditions, there was nonetheless in the years of 
Soviet power in Central Asia a process of de-Islamization of 
this region. Even if the Islamists gain the ascendancy in 
Tajikistan, it would still take them a long time to re-Islamize 
the population and the way of life. 
  Re-Ismalization would by no means lead to the installation 
of 
aggressive and bellicose fundamentalism and the triumph of 
religious fanaticism. The process would most likely take a very 
long time and could take its natural course. The aggression of 
one state against another could be halted by a collective 
security treaty, but I doubt that it is possible via a system of 
collective security to intervene in a civil war on the side of 
one of the warring parties, even less prevent the spread of this 
religious idea and movement or the other. Russia has no reason 
today to involve itself in this enervating process, which is 
absolutely futile for it. In time, if fundamentalism really 
becomes the predominant trend in Central Asia, it will always 
have time to fence itself off from this threat, establishing new 
borders with the Central Asian countries. Until then the maximum 
form of Russian participation in the region could be exclusively 
the development of economic relations and the training of 
national armies and arms supplies, but under no circumstances 
participation in internal showdowns in these republics on this 
side or the other. 
  Since the process of re-Islamization, even if it occurs 
without serious resistance, will, for all that, take quite a 
long time, it will be possible in this time to withdraw the rest 
of the Russian and Russian-speaking population from the other 
Central Asian republics. True, when solving these two important 
questions: the nonparticipation of Russian troops in a civil war 
and the withdrawal of the Russian population from the region, 
Russia will have to resolve the problem of the protection of its 
geopolitical interests in this region. Neither individually nor 
together nor as a result of the acquisition of various 
configurations on account of the possible disintegration of 
Afghanistan along ethnic lines would the newly formed countries 
of Central Asia be in a position for a long time to come to 
seriously threaten Russia's interests. Unless some other 
contiguous regional superpower appears in this region and 
attempts to stabilize the situation, these countries themselves 
will be within the sphere of Russia's economic and 
military-political influence. 
  Russia will try here to harmonize interests and resolve 
conflicts both within these countries and between them. Without 
aiming to attract these countries into a given state, Russia's 
long-term strategy will at the same time quite clearly be to 
prevent the advance into this region of third countries aiming 
to become a dominating force. Russia will also prevent attempts 
at the possible enlistment of these countries in 
military-political and economic alliances with any other 
regional great power, be it Turkey, Iran, Pakistan, or another 
state. Russia has for this a sufficiency of both economic and 
military-political potential and diplomatic resources. 
  This is the sole region of those constituting the former 
USSR, perhaps, which Russia should keep in the sphere of its 
influence or as a neutral buffer zone to avoid the formation of 
some serious military-political alliance with the participation 
of third countries in what is for it the most vulnerable 
geopolitical zone--the southeast of the country. 
<H5>  The Transcaucasus </H5>
  The Caucasus region is a traditional political boundary and 
object of struggle for spheres of influence among Turkey, Iran, 
and Russia. In civilization terms the Caucasus is divided into a 
zone of predominantly Christian and a zone of Muslim 
orientation. The Transcaucasus and North Caucasus are divided 
into a zone of predominantly Christian and a zone of Muslim 
orientation. The Transcaucasus and North Caucasus represent a 
single geopolitical zone in which similar processes are 
occurring. The incorporation of the North Caucasus in the sphere 
of influence of Russia practically simultaneously brought about 
also Russian expansion in the Transcaucasus, which stopped at 
the natural boundaries of the southern spurs of the Lesser 
Caucasus and the River Araks. The displacement from these 
boundaries of Russia in the period of the 1917-1920 revolution 
entailed not only the defection of the Transcaucasus but also a 
loss of control over the entire Caucasus region, which was 
restored anew with the use of force in 1920-1921. The Caucasus 
represents a cultural, religious, and ethnic mosaic, and, beyond 
the control of the great powers bordering it, the peoples of 
this region, by virtue of their cultural and historical 
singularities, are unwilling to or cannot realize full 
integration. But the creation of independent states in the 
Caucasus outside of the system of influence of one of the great 
powers adjacent to the region is impossible also owing to the 
ethnic mix of the population, the small dimensions of such 
states, the limited economic potential, and the geopolitical 
isolation. 
  It is for this reason that the states of the Caucasus never 
in the visible past enjoyed full state independence and were 
always either part of the territory or vassals of Persia, 
Turkey, or Russia. 
  The incorporation of the Caucasus in the Russian state at 
the 
start and in the middle of the 19th century led to the rapid 
cultural development of practically all the peoples of the 
Caucasus and the conversion of the Caucasus into an economically 
prosperous region. At the start of the 20th century no political 
party in the Caucasus advocated separation from Russia but 
proposed merely this version or the other of cultural-national 
or territorial autonomy. Only the extremely unpropitious 
political situation and the victory of the communists in Russia 
forced the Caucasus peoples to proclaim their total independence 
of their northern neighbor. 
  The new forcible incorporation of the Caucasus in the Soviet 
Union was marked on the one hand by a continuation of the rapid 
economic and, to some extent, cultural development of the 
region, on the other, by the suppression of entire layers of 
cultural-national and religious consciousness and, what is 
particularly tragic, an attempt to wipe out entire peoples. In 
not one region of the communist world did mass deportation 
assume such proportions as in the Caucasus. The total disregard 
for the zones of settlement and ethno-cultural interests of the 
peoples who lived in the Transcaucasus when the internal 
administrative boundaries were drawn in the Soviet period 
increased the potential tension of conflict in this region. It 
was checked only by the totalitarian pressure of the Soviet 
state. And following the disintegration of communist statehood, 
the Caucasus was the first region of the USSR in which war 
erupted. 
  The economic prosperity of the Caucasus in the Soviet period 
was brought about for the most part by the natural-climatic 
character of the region, unique for the USSR, with borders 
practically closed to foreign trade in analogous commodities. 
  Heavy and manufacturing industry, which had been actively 
developed, was oriented entirely toward the all-Union market and 
satisfied only to a small extent the requirements of the 
Caucasus republics themselves. 
  The well-developed system of higher and specialized 
education 
produced considerably more skilled workers than was needed for 
the requirements of the Caucasus republics themselves. Thus the 
cultural and economic well-being of the region depended entirely 
on its connection with the remaining space of the USSR. And in 
the event of the severance of the Caucasus from the northern 
market, poverty, social inequality, and general economic 
degradation were just as inevitable as interethnic wars. 
  But the national elites, particularly the national 
intelligentsia, of the states of the Caucasus did not, for the 
most part, notice the danger connected with state independence. 
They assumed and were able to convince the people that the level 
achieved within the framework of the USSR would not only be 
preserved but would also be appreciably surpassed after the 
Caucasus peoples had detached themselves from Russia and united 
with peoples culturally and historically close to them. 
  Azerbaijan anticipated a conjunction with Turkey and, to a 
lesser extent, Iran, the small Muslim peoples of the Caucasus 
put their hopes in support from the Islamic world, and Armenia 
and hoped via the big national diasporas in the Western 
countries and the traditional orientation toward Europe to 
become a little Europe in the Transcaucasus. But from the very 
first steps national independence was doomed by all the 
above-identified sum of negative factors. Throughout the period 
1988-1993 the Caucasus rapidly became a zone of complete 
military opposition and conflict and an area of social disaster 
and the impoverishment of the populace down to levels 
incommensurable with other regions of the USSR. This evoked 
general disenchantment with the ideology of nationalism even in 
the leaders who, preaching it, had come to power at the time 
these states achieved independence. The more radical the mood of 
the national leaders, the greater the extent to which they lost 
the support of the populace when the consequences of the 
severance from Russia became obvious. The ouster of the 
Gamsakhurdia administration in Georgia in 1992 and that of 
Elchibey in Azerbaijan in 1993 is merely the most graphic 
testimony to this. 
  As far as Armenia is concerned, the leadership of this 
republic, confronted with the need for self-preservation under 
the conditions of the blockade and all-out war with Azerbaijan 
for Karabakh, saw earlier than the other countries of the 
Transcaucasus an orientation toward Russia as the sole 
possibility of survival. This explains the comparative weakness 
of the antigovernment mood in the masses of the Armenian 
population. Alternative political programs of a continuation of 
the detachment from Russia enjoy a certain support in the broad 
masses of the population of the Caucasus at this time only in 
the regions that remain within the Russian state (the republics 
of the North Caucasus). Where, on the other hand, separation 
from Russia has become a reality, anti-Russian orientations 
persist only with part of the national intelligentsia and the 
political elite, not being shared in practice by the people. 
Following the disintegration of the USSR, the Caucasus has 
proven to be an area of priority attention, primarily of the 
powers that have traditionally rivaled Russia for influence in 
this region. Both Iran and Turkey are making consistent efforts 
to establish their political and economic hegemony in the 
Caucasus. Two antagonistic world groupings can to a considerable 
extent be discerned behind these regional powers: behind Turkey, 
the Western world, behind Iran, the movement of Muslim 
fundamentalism. Aside from this, Western countries also have 
their own direct interests in the Transcaucasus. It may be 
assumed that a struggle for priority influence on Georgia, 
Armenia, and Azerbaijan between Germany on the one hand and the 
Anglo-Saxon countries on the other will unfold in the very near 
future. The United States is trying to play the part of neutral 
arbiter here in the conflict of interests in the Transcaucasus. 
The United States' aim of making democratic and West-oriented 
Turkey the leader in this region as a counterweight to Islamic 
fundamentalism, which is dangerous to the West and whose 
representative in the region is Iran, can be discerned here. All 
the foreign powers agree here that Russia, as a geopolitical 
force, should leave the Caucasus region. Russia should hardly be 
deceived by the constant statements of Western countries to the 
effect that they recognize Russia's interests in the 
Transcaucasus. 
  Considering Russia's special interests in this region, where 
it is directly or indirectly involved in all local conflicts, it 
will have to determine its priorities and defend them 
consistently to stabilize its southern borders and preserve its 
influence in the Caucasus. 
  The fact that the economies of these republics are fully 
tied 
to Russia and that the popularity of the idea of integration 
with Russia is growing among the population is of considerable 
significance here. 
  Considering that disintegration processes are at the present 
time increasing both in Azerbaijan and in Georgia (the virtual 
independence of Ajaria, Nakhichevan, Nagornyy Karabakh, 
Mengrelia, the Talysh region, and Lezgistan the Kurdish Sunni 
movement), in order to achieve stability and peace in this 
region Russia should establish itself as the guarantor of the 
national and territorial autonomy of these formations. Only 
observance of the rights of the small peoples and cultural 
communities guaranteed by Russia should permit the Russian 
authorities to guarantee and ensure the territorial integrity of 
these new states. The de facto federalization of Azerbaijan and 
Georgia is under way. The enshrinement of this situation de jure 
with Russia's guarantees could restore peace in this region. 
Such a federalized Caucasus would need for national and cultural 
self-preservation and economic and geopolitical stability close 
economic and military-political integration in the space of that 
particular one of the rival powers in the Caucasus which is able 
to the maximum extent to ensure political democracy and a 
dispassionate attitude toward the self-government of the 
national groups populating the Caucasus. 
  At the present time neither Turkey nor Iran, burdened with 
national and religious intolerance and also inclined toward 
authoritarian methods of statehood, could, obviously, ensure the 
minimum rights not only of the Christian peoples of the Caucasus 
but even of their same-faith Muslim peoples, with minorities of 
which both Turkey and Iran have big problems within their own 
borders (the population of South Azerbaijan, the Kurds of 
Turkey, and the North Caucasus peoples living in Turkey). Only 
Russia, built on the principles of a secular territorial 
federation and ensuring the rights of the peoples and religious 
groups as political aggregates, could be attractive to the 
Caucasus. Considering also the continued attachment of the 
Caucasus to Russia, the integration of a federalized Caucasus 
space together with the Russian Federation within the framework 
of the CIS would seem perfectly possible. It should be 
considered that the defection of the Transcaucasus from the CIS 
would inevitably signify a destabilization of the North Caucasus 
and the pushing back of the Russian border to the line of the 
Don and Volga estuaries, which would seem catastrophic for 
future of Russia. 
  The defection of the Caucasus (from the CIS or even its 
Muslim part alone) would afford an opportunity for the unimpeded 
advancement of Islamic hegemonism on the territory of Central 
Asia and Kazakhstan with its possible appearance in internal 
territories of Russia populated by peoples confessing Islam. 
Russia's active policy in the Transcaucasus and the integration 
of this entire region in the geopolitical space of the CIS, 
therefore, is of paramount significance for the stability of the 
entire Russian state both in the immediate future and in the 
long term. 
<H5>  Conclusion </H5>
  Summing up the analysis of the formation and evolution of 
Russia's foreign policy, policy in respect to the "near abroad" 
in particular, several very important conclusions may be drawn. 
  First, the process of the shaping of Russia's priorities 
both 
in relation to the "near abroad" as a whole and in relation to 
each country and region of the former Soviet Union is taking 
place with difficulty, in a conflict between different 
departments (particularly the Ministry of Foreign Affairs and 
the Ministry of Defense of the Russian Federation), in a debate 
between politicians and analysts, and in a confrontation of the 
corps of deputies and the executive. Centrifugal trends have 
given way to centripetal trends, and the return of all the 
former republics of the Union, other than the Baltic republics, 
within the CIS, the conclusion of the economic union, and the 
creation of the ruble zone and a common border by a number of 
republics testify that Russia is feeling its way toward general 
reference points of its policy in relation to the countries of 
the "near abroad." 
  Second, these countries will, by all accounts, occupy for a 
long time to come a special place in Russia's foreign policy, 
and the general yardsticks which are employed in an evaluation 
of the relations and the methods of the pursuit of the policy of 
Russia with countries of the "far abroad" could hardly be 
applied in respect to them. The common economic roots, the 
degree of integration of the economies and cultures, and the 
presence in a number of countries of common ethnic and religious 
roots make essential for Russia the pursuit of two types of 
foreign policy: one with countries of the "near abroad," the 
other, with those of the "far abroad." True, this by no means 
signifies that Russia would like to enshrine the transitional 
nature of relations with the former Soviet republics for all 
time. The two foreign policies of Russia will, most likely, be 
of a temporary nature. 
  The transitional nature of foreign policy with countries of 
the "near abroad" could last until the completion of the process 
of the formation of national states, detached from one another, 
in all 15 republics with the independent adaptation of these 
states in international economic and military-political 
structures or, on the other hand, as the result of an 
intensification of integration processes around Russia within 
the framework of the CIS, until the formation on the basis of 
these states of a new state, federative-confederative, possibly. 
  Until then Russia's policy in the "near abroad" will be of a 
particular, transitional nature incorporating not only the 
traditional diplomatic channels of interaction. 
  And, finally, Russia has clearly declared its special 
interests throughout the space of the former USSR, and the 
attempts of third countries to impede the processes of the 
integration of this space around Russia and the stabilization of 
the situation with its help in this space will be regarded by 
Russia as unfriendly actions in relation to it and could signify 
a complication of the Russian Federation's relations with these 
countries. The attempts of any countries whatever to become the 
guarantors of the evolved borders between the republics of the 
USSR and to hinder the natural and peaceful process of these 
countries' integration in a common economic and 
military-political union, hints at which are contained in 
publications that analyze shifts in the United States' foreign 
policy strategy in relation to Russia and the former republics 
of the USSR, could seriously complicate the process of the 
formation of the new world order and evoke misgivings in Russia 
as to whether the United States and its other partners in the 
West are seriously prepared to take account of Russia's 
geopolitical interests. The "near abroad" will in the very near 
future become the first proving ground of the durability of the 
partner relations between Russia and the United States and other 
Western countries and of the parties' readiness to understand 
and take stock of one another's vital interests. 

